District of Columbia statutes.
6-703.06

Violation of §§ 6-703.03 to 6-703.09.

Any owner entitled to the beneficial use, rental, or control of any building failing or neglecting to provide means of egress, guide signs, guide lights, exit lights, hall and stairway lights, standpipes, fire extinguishers, alarm gongs and striking stations, or other appliances required by the regulations promulgated under §§ 6-703.03 to 6-703.09 after notice from the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agents so to do, shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $100 per day for each and every day he fails to comply with such notice. Any person violating any other provision of §§ 6-703.03 to 6-703.09 or regulations promulgated hereunder shall be punished, upon conviction thereof, by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $100 per day for each and every day such violation exists.

Dec. 24, 1942, 56 Stat. 1084, ch. 818, § 4
1981 Ed., § 5-521.
1973 Ed., § 5-320.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.